output.aff
SFX B N 181
SFX B   0           y          [aeiouy]rod
SFX B   0           a          [aeiouy]rod
SFX B   0           ov         [aeiouy]rod
SFX B   0           u          [aeiouy]rod
SFX B   0           om         [aeiouy]rod
SFX B   0           e          [aeiouy]rod
SFX B   0           och        [aeiouy]rod
SFX B   0           mi         [aeiouy]rod
SFX B   0           y          [^aeiouy]rod
SFX B   0           u          [^aeiouy]rod
SFX B   0           ov         [^aeiouy]rod
SFX B   0           om         [^aeiouy]rod
SFX B   0           e          [^aeiouy]rod
SFX B   0           och        [^aeiouy]rod
SFX B   0           mi         [^aeiouy]rod
SFX B   0           y          [^r]od
SFX B   0           u          [^r]od
SFX B   0           ov         [^r]od
SFX B   0           om         [^r]od
SFX B   0           e          [^r]od
SFX B   0           och        [^r]od
SFX B   0           mi         [^r]od
SFX B   0           y          [^o]d
SFX B   0           u          [^o]d
SFX B   0           ov         [^o]d
SFX B   0           om         [^o]d
SFX B   0           e          [^o]d
SFX B   0           och        [^o]d
SFX B   0           mi         [^o]d
SFX B   0           a          otok
SFX B   0           a          stol
SFX B   0           y          to[klnv]
SFX B   0           u          to[klnv]
SFX B   0           ov         to[klnv]
SFX B   0           om         to[klnv]
SFX B   0           och        to[klnv]
SFX B   0           om         to[klnv]
SFX B   0           mi         to[klnv]
SFX B   0           y          [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           a          [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           ov         [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           u          [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           om         [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           e          [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           och        [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           om         [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           mi         [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           i          ial
SFX B   0           e          [^i]al
SFX B   0           y          el
SFX B   0           u          el
SFX B   0           ov         el
SFX B   0           om         el
SFX B   0           i          el
SFX B   0           och        el
SFX B   0           ami        el
SFX B   ol          oly        ol
SFX B   ol          ola        ol
SFX B   ol          olov       ol
SFX B   ol          olu        ol
SFX B   ol          olom       ol
SFX B   ol          ole        ol
SFX B   ol          oloch      ol
SFX B   ol          olami      ol
SFX B   0           y          [^eoo]l
SFX B   0           u          [^eoo]l
SFX B   0           ov         [^eoo]l
SFX B   0           om         [^eoo]l
SFX B   0           e          [^aeoo]l
SFX B   0           och        [^eoo]l
SFX B   0           ami        [^eoo]l
SFX B   0           e          yv
SFX B   0           y          [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           a          [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           ov         [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           u          [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           om         [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           och        [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           om         [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           mi         [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           y          [aeiouy]r
SFX B   0           a          [ouy]r
SFX B   0           ov         [aeiouy]r
SFX B   0           u          [aeiouy]r
SFX B   0           om         [aeiouy]r
SFX B   0           e          [aeiouy]r
SFX B   0           och        [aeiouy]r
SFX B   0           mi         [aeiouy]r
SFX B   us          y          mus
SFX B   us          u          mus
SFX B   us          ov         mus
SFX B   us          om         mus
SFX B   us          e          mus
SFX B   us          och        mus
SFX B   us          ami        mus
SFX B   os          u          mos
SFX B   os          om         mos
SFX B   os          e          mos
SFX B   os          y          mos
SFX B   os          ov         mos
SFX B   os          och        mos
SFX B   os          ami        mos
SFX B   0           y          [^m]us
SFX B   0           u          [^m]us
SFX B   0           ov         [^m]us
SFX B   0           om         [^m]us
SFX B   0           e          [^m]us
SFX B   0           och        [^m]us
SFX B   0           mi         [^m]us
SFX B   0           y          [^u]s
SFX B   0           ov         [^u]s
SFX B   0           u          [^u]s
SFX B   0           om         [^u]s
SFX B   0           e          [^u]s
SFX B   0           och        [^u]s
SFX B   0           mi         [^u]s
SFX B   0           a          [^au]s
SFX B   0           a          at
SFX B   0           y          [aeiouy]vet
SFX B   0           u          [aeiouy]vet
SFX B   0           ov         [aeiouy]vet
SFX B   0           om         [aeiouy]vet
SFX B   0           e          [aeiouy]vet
SFX B   0           och        [aeiouy]vet
SFX B   0           mi         [aeiouy]vet
SFX B   0           y          [^aeiouy]vet
SFX B   0           a          [^aeiouy]vet
SFX B   0           ov         [^aeiouy]vet
SFX B   0           u          [^aeiouy]vet
SFX B   0           om         [^aeiouy]vet
SFX B   0           e          [^aeiouy]vet
SFX B   0           och        [^aeiouy]vet
SFX B   0           mi         [^aeiouy]vet
SFX B   0           y          [^cv]et
SFX B   0           u          [^cv]et
SFX B   0           ov         [^cv]et
SFX B   0           om         [^cv]et
SFX B   0           e          [^cv]et
SFX B   0           och        [^cv]et
SFX B   0           mi         [^cv]et
SFX B   0           a          sit
SFX B   0           a          ust
SFX B   0           a          kut
SFX B   0           y          [^e]t
SFX B   0           u          [^e]t
SFX B   0           ov         [^e]t
SFX B   0           om         [^e]t
SFX B   0           e          [^e]t
SFX B   0           och        [^e]t
SFX B   0           ami        [^e]t
SFX B   0           a          ivot
SFX B   0           e          [aa]v
SFX B   0           y          o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           a          o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           ov         o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           u          o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           om         o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           e          o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           och        o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           mi         o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           y          [^dgklrstv]
SFX B   0           u          [^dgklrstv]
SFX B   0           ov         [^dgklrstv]
SFX B   0           om         [^dgklrstv]
SFX B   0           e          [^dghklrstv]
SFX B   0           och        [^dgklrstv]
SFX B   0           mi         [^dgklmrstv]
SFX B   0           ami        [m]
SFX B   0           ia         tan
SFX B   og          gov        zog
SFX B   og          gy         zog
SFX B   og          gu         zog
SFX B   og          gom        zog
SFX B   og          goch       zog
SFX B   og          gmi        zog
SFX B   0           y          [^z]og
SFX B   0           u          [^z]og
SFX B   0           ov         [^z]og
SFX B   0           om         [^z]og
SFX B   0           och        [^z]og
SFX B   0           mi         [^z]og
